Hawaii, session 2026, HB2498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that many licensed care homes in central Oahu operate in aging facilities and serve vulnerable populations, including kupuna, individuals with disabilities, and medically fragile residents.  These facilities are particularly susceptible to damage from natural disasters, climate-related hazards, and prolonged power outages.  Strengthening the physical infrastructure and disaster resilience of these care homes is critical to safeguarding resident health and safety, minimizing emergency response needs, and supporting community stability and recovery. The purpose of this Act is to establish the central Oahu care home community resilience pilot program to assist eligible licensed care home facilities within the 96797 postal zip code on the island of Oahu in enhancing their resilience against natural disasters, climate-related risks, and extended utility disruptions. SECTION 2.  (a) The Hawaii emergency management agency, in coordination with the office of health care assurance of the department of health, shall establish the central Oahu care home community resilience pilot program. (b)  The purpose of the pilot program shall be to assist eligible licensed care home facilities within the 96797 postal zip code on the island of Oahu to implement structural and operational resilience improvements; provided that eligible structural and operational resilience improvements may include but are not limited to: (1)  Roof reinforcement, hurricane clips, and wind-resistant materials; (2)  Impact-resistant windows, storm shutters, and strengthened doors; (3)  Backup power systems and battery storage for essential medical equipment; (4)  Air filtration or cooling enhancements for extreme heat or wildfire smoke; (5)  Fire-resistant landscaping and defensible space; and (6)  Shelter-in-place or safe room modifications. (c)  The pilot program may provide, as funds permit: (1)  Grants, rebates, or contracted services for structure hardening; (2)  Facility vulnerability assessments for wind, heat, wildfire smoke, and power disruption risks; (3)  Technical assistance and training in preparedness and continuity of operations; and (4)  Support for emergency power and cooling solutions for medically fragile residents. (d)  The following care home facilities within the 96797 postal zip code on the island of Oahu shall be eligible for the pilot program: (1)  Adult residential care homes; (2)  Expanded adult residential care homes; (3)  Community care foster family homes; (4)  Developmental disabilities domiciliary homes; (5)  Intermediate care facilities; and (6)  Any other licensed residential care home serving vulnerable populations within the 96797 postal zip code on the island of Oahu. (e)  The pilot program shall prioritize assistance to care home facilities that: (1)  Serve low-income residents, kupuna, or persons with disabilities; (2)  House residents dependent on life-sustaining medical equipment; (3)  Are located in high-risk hazard zones; (4)  Operate in structures more than twenty-five years old; and (5)  Demonstrate financial need. (f)  Each care home facility shall adopt an evacuation plan for its residents and employees. (g)  The Hawaii emergency management agency, in collaboration with the office of health care assurance of the department of health, shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall include: (1)  The number and types of care homes assisted; (2)  Completed assessments and improvements; (3)  Estimated reductions in disaster-related risks; (4)  Stakeholder feedback; and (5)  Recommendations for extending or expanding the pilot program statewide, including proposed legislation. (h)  The Hawaii emergency management agency may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to implement this Act. (i)  As used in this Act: "Kupuna" means an individual who is sixty years of age or older or who has specific care needs. "Pilot program" means the central Oahu care home community resilience pilot program. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the central Oahu care home community resilience pilot program pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________